Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-1290
Legislative proceedings; how proved.

The proceedings of the Legislature of this state, or any state of the Union, or of the United States, or of any foreign government, are proved by the journals of those bodies, respectively, or of either branch thereof, and either by copies officially certified by the clerk of the house in which the proceedings were had, or by a copy purporting to have been printed by their order.

R.S.1867, Code § 418, p. 463;

R.S.1913, § 7983;

C.S.1922, § 8924;

C.S.1929, § 20-1290;

R.S.1943, § 25-1290.

Where entries in journal expressly and unequivocally contradict enrolled bill, former will prevail. State v. Burlington & Missouri River R. R. Co., 60 Neb. 741, 84 N.W. 254 (1901).

If it appears from journals of Legislature that bill had not actually passed, certificate of presiding officer is overthrown and bill is invalid. Webster v. City of Hastings, 56 Neb. 669, 77 N.W. 127 (1898).